New York, session 2025-2026, A10384.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 604 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by 2 chapter 196 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 604. Reports; contents; preparation; distribution; filing. a. 4 Reports of accidents required under sections six hundred three and six 5 hundred three-a of this article, or under the rules and regulations of 6 the commissioner, shall be upon forms prepared by the commissioner and 7 contain such information as the commissioner shall prescribe; provided, 8 however, that the commissioner shall provide space on such forms to 9 indicate the type or types of vehicles involved, including passenger 10 motor vehicles, commercial motor vehicles, motorcycles, limited use 11 motorcycles, off-highway motorcycles, electric scooters, bicycles with 12 electric assist, and/or bicycles. Blank forms for such reports shall be 13 printed by the commissioner and a supply sent to all city, town and 14 village clerks and to the chief officer of every city police department 15 for general distribution and use as herein provided. Reports of acci- 16 dents, required under the preceding section, shall be sent to and filed 17 with the commissioner at the main office of the bureau of motor vehicles 18 in the city of Albany, except as otherwise provided by the rules and 19 regulations of the commissioner. 20 b. Vehicle accident report information contained in forms as 21 prescribed by this section which are not private information may be 22 released to responsible vendors pursuant to contracts with the depart- 23 ment. Any such contract entered into by the department shall contain 24 language prohibiting vendors from assigning the contract and from any 25 use or resale of the information received which use or resale is contra- 26 ry to the public policy of this state or is contrary to the public 27 morals or welfare. For the purposes of this section, "private informa- 28 tion" shall have the same meaning as section eight hundred ninety-nine- 29 aa of the general business law. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14834-01-6